Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-1616
Procedures for insuring compliance with Nebraska Energy Code; costs; appeal.

For purposes of insuring compliance with section 81-1614:

(1) The department, or its authorized agent, may conduct such inspections and investigations as are necessary to make a determination pursuant to section 81-1625 and may issue an order containing and resulting from the findings of such inspections and investigations; and

(2) A building owner may submit a written request that the department undertake a determination pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section. Such request shall include a list of reasons why the building owner believes such a determination is necessary.

A building owner aggrieved by the determination, or refusal to make such determination, under this section may appeal such determination or refusal, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

The department may charge an amount sufficient to recover the costs of providing such determinations.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 40;

Laws 1981, LB 799, § 7;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 17;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 28;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 162.
July 1, 2019
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.